District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.05

Revocation or subsequent limitation of certificate of authority.

If a universal bank fails to maintain the standards and requirements of § 26-1401.03(c), the Commissioner shall, by order, revoke or limit the exercise of the powers of the universal bank.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 205, 48 DCR 3244

History